Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202623-1112.01
County officers; employees; use of automobile; allowance.

(1) If a trip or trips included in an expense claim filed by any county officer or employee for mileage are made by personal automobile or otherwise, only one claim shall be allowed pursuant to section 23-1112, regardless of the fact that one or more persons are transported in the motor vehicle.

(2) No charge for mileage shall be allowed when such mileage accrues while using any motor vehicle owned by the State of Nebraska.

(3) No charge for mileage shall be allowed when such mileage accrues while using any motor vehicle owned by a county, except as provided in section 33-117.

Laws 1957, c. 70, § 12, p. 304;

Laws 1961, c. 88, § 4, p. 309;

Laws 1967, c. 125, § 2, p. 401;

Laws 1973, LB 338, § 2;

Laws 1974, LB 615, § 2;

Laws 1978, LB 691, § 2;

Laws 1980, LB 615, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 26;

Laws 1996, LB 1011, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB609, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB1162, § 1.